North Dakota statutes. TITLE 37 Military
CHAPTER 37-17.1 Emergency Services

37-17.1-01.
Short title.

This chapter must be cited as the North Dakota Disaster Act of 1985.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 281, § 1; 1985, ch. 398, § 1.

Cross-References.

Communities failing to adopt or enforce floodplain management ordinance ineligible for assistance, see N.D.C.C. § 61-16.2-09.

37-17.1-02.
Purposes.

The purposes of this chapter are to:

Reduce vulnerability of people and communities of this state to damage, injury, and loss of life and property resulting from natural or manmade disasters or emergencies, threats to homeland security, or hostile military or paramilitary action.

Provide a setting conducive to the rapid and orderly start of restoration and rehabilitation of persons and property affected by disasters or emergencies.

Clarify the roles of the governor, state agencies, and local governments in prevention of, in mitigation of, preparation for, response to, and recovery from disasters or emergencies.

Authorize and provide for coordination of emergency management activities by agencies and officers of this state, and similar state-local, interstate, federal-state, and foreign activities in which the state and its political subdivisions may participate.

Provide for a statewide emergency management system embodying all aspects of prevention, mitigation, preparedness, response, and recovery and incorporating the principles of the national incident management system and its incident command system, as well as other applicable federal mandates.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 281, § 2; 1985, ch. 398, § 2; 2007, ch. 308, § 1.

37-17.1-02.1.
Department of emergency services.

The department of emergency services consists of a division of state radio and a division of homeland security. The adjutant general is the director of the department. The adjutant general shall provide for shared administration of both divisions. The adjutant general shall appoint a separate director of each division. A division director serves at the pleasure of the adjutant general. The adjutant general shall fix the compensation of a division director within limits of legislative appropriation.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 16, § 12; 2007, ch. 308, § 2; 2019, ch. 290, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

37-17.1-02.2.
Advisory committee to department of emergency services.

The adjutant general shall create one or more advisory committees to the department of emergency services. An advisory committee may consist of not more than twelve members representing local and state interests in the department. Members must be appointed to four-year staggered terms. An advisory committee shall advise the department regarding collaboration with political subdivisions, and each member of an advisory committee shall report to the local interest each member represents concerning recommendations approved by the committee. Each member of the advisory committee is entitled to be paid sixty-two dollars and fifty cents per day for time spent in attendance at meetings and is entitled to be reimbursed for the member’s actual and necessary expenses at the rates and in the manner provided by law for other state officers. The compensation and expenses must be paid out of department appropriations.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 16, § 13; 2019, ch. 290, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

37-17.1-03.
Limitations.

Nothing in this chapter may:

Interfere with the course or conduct of a labor dispute, except that actions otherwise authorized by this chapter or other laws may be taken when necessary to forestall or mitigate imminent or existing danger to public health or safety.

Interfere with dissemination of news or comment on public affairs. Any communications facility or organization, including radio and television stations, wire services, and newspapers may be required to transmit or print public service messages furnishing information or instructions in connection with a disaster or emergency situation.

Affect the jurisdiction or responsibilities of units of the armed forces of the United States or of this state, or of any personnel thereof, when on active duty. State and local emergency operational plans must place reliance upon the forces available for performance of functions related to disasters or emergencies.

Limit, modify, or abridge the authority of the governor to proclaim martial law, provide aid or assistance to civil authorities, or exercise any other powers vested in the governor under the Constitution of North Dakota, or statutes, common law, or sovereign powers of this state independent of, or in conjunction with, any provisions of this chapter.

Change or modify the responsibilities of the American National Red Cross as defined by the Congress of the United States in 36 U.S.C. 300101.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 281, § 3; 1985, ch. 398, § 3.

37-17.1-04.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Critical industry sectors” means any of the critical infrastructure sectors identified by the United States government whose assets, systems, and networks, whether physical or virtual, are considered so vital to the United States and the state that the sectors’ incapacitation or destruction would have a debilitating effect on security, economic security, public health or safety, or any combination thereof.

“Disaster” means the occurrence of widespread or severe damage, injury, or loss of life or property resulting from any natural or manmade cause, including fire, flood, earthquake, severe high and low temperatures, tornado storm, wave action, chemical spill, or other water or air contamination, epidemic, blight, drought, infestation, explosion, riot, or hostile military or paramilitary action, or cyber attack which is determined by the governor to require state or state and federal assistance or actions to supplement the recovery efforts of local governments in alleviating the damage, loss, hardship, or suffering caused thereby.

“Disaster or emergency worker” means any person performing disaster or emergency responsibilities or duties at any place in this state subject to the order or control of, or pursuant to a request of, the state government or any political subdivision.

“Emergency” means any situation that is determined by the governor to require state or state and federal response or mitigation actions to protect lives and property, to provide for public health and safety, or to avert or lessen the threat of a disaster. Emergencies require an immediate supplement to local governments or aid to critical industry sectors that provide essential lifeline services.

“Emergency management” means a comprehensive integrated system at all levels of government and in the private sector which provides for the development and maintenance of an effective capability to prevent, mitigate, prepare for, respond to, and recover from known and unforeseen hazards or situations, caused by an act of nature or man, which may threaten, injure, damage, or destroy lives, property, or our environment.

“Homeland security” means a concerted national effort to prevent terrorist attacks within the United States, reduce America’s vulnerability to terrorism, and minimize the damage and recover from attacks in the United States.

“Incident command system” means a standardized on-scene incident management concept designated specifically to allow responders to adopt an integrated organizational structure equal to the complexity and demands of any single incident or multiple incidents without being hindered by jurisdictional boundaries.

“Mass care” means food, clothing, shelter, and other necessary and essential assistance provided to a large number of affected people in response to, or recovery from, a disaster or emergency.

“National incident management system” means a system that provides a consistent nationwide approach for federal, state, and local governments to work effectively and efficiently together to prepare for, respond to, and recover from domestic incidents regardless of cause, size, or complexity.

“Wide area search and rescue” means the employment, coordination, and utilization of available resources and personnel in activities occurring within large geographical areas for the purpose of locating, relieving distress, and preserving the life of an individual reported or believed to be lost, stranded, or deemed a high-risk missing individual, and removing any survivor to a place of safety.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 281, § 4; 1985, ch. 398, § 4; 1997, ch. 315, § 1; 2007, ch. 308, § 3; 2013, ch. 267, § 1; 2017, ch. 243, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 267, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

37-17.1-05.
The governor and disasters or emergencies — Penalty.

The governor is responsible to minimize or avert the adverse effects of a disaster or emergency.

Under this chapter, the governor may issue executive orders and proclamations, and amend or rescind them. Executive orders, proclamations, and regulations have the force of law.

A disaster or emergency must be declared by executive order or proclamation of the governor if the governor determines a disaster has occurred or a state of emergency exists.

Except as provided in subdivision b, the state of disaster or emergency continues until the governor determines the threat of an emergency has passed or the governor determines the disaster has been dealt with to the extent emergency conditions no longer exist, whichever occurs first.

If a state of disaster or emergency relating to public health is declared and in effect and the legislative assembly is not in session, the legislative management may meet to vote on whether the legislative management should request the governor call a special session of the legislative assembly. If the governor does not call a special session within seven days after the legislative management sends a request to the governor, the declared state of disaster or emergency relating to public health terminates thirty days after the request from the legislative management was sent to the governor. If the governor calls a special session within seven days after the request from the legislative management was sent, the special session must be held within fifteen days of the governor’s call for a special session. If the legislative assembly meets to address a declared state of disaster or emergency, the legislative assembly by concurrent resolution may terminate, extend, or modify the state of disaster or emergency.

The legislative assembly by concurrent resolution may terminate a state of disaster or emergency at any time.

All executive orders or proclamations issued under this subsection must indicate the nature of the disaster or emergency, the area or areas threatened, the conditions that have brought it about or which make possible termination of the state of disaster or emergency. An executive order or proclamation must be disseminated promptly by means calculated to bring its contents to the attention of the general public, unless the circumstances attendant upon the disaster or emergency prevent or impede such dissemination, and it must be filed promptly with the department of emergency services, the legislative council, the secretary of state, and the county or city auditor of the jurisdictions affected.

An executive order or proclamation of a state of disaster or emergency shall activate the state and local operational plans applicable to the political subdivision or area in question and be authority for the deployment and use of any forces to which the plan or plans apply and for use or distribution of any supplies, equipment, and materials and facilities assembled, stockpiled, or arranged to be made available pursuant to this chapter or any other provision of law relating to a disaster or emergency.

During the continuance of any state of disaster or emergency declared by the governor, the governor is commander in chief of the emergency management organization and of all other forces available for emergency duty. To the greatest extent practicable, the governor shall delegate or assign command authority by prior arrangement embodied in appropriate executive orders or emergency operational plans, but nothing herein restricts the governor’s authority to do so by orders issued at the time of the disaster or emergency.

In addition to any other powers conferred upon the governor by law, the governor may:

Suspend the provisions of any regulatory statute prescribing the procedures for conduct of state business, or the orders, rules, or regulations of any state agency, if strict compliance with the provisions of any statute, order, rule, or regulation would in any way prevent, hinder, or delay necessary action in managing a disaster or emergency.

Utilize all available resources of the state government as reasonably necessary to manage the disaster or emergency and of each political subdivision of the state.

Transfer the direction, personnel, or functions of state departments and agencies or units thereof for the purpose of performing or facilitating emergency management activities.

Subject to any applicable requirements for compensation under section 37-17.1-12, commandeer or utilize any private property if the governor finds this necessary to manage the disaster or emergency.

Direct and compel the evacuation of all or part of the population from any stricken or threatened area within the state if the governor deems this action necessary for the preservation of life or other disaster or emergency mitigation, response, or recovery.

Prescribe routes, modes of transportation, and destinations in connection with an evacuation.

Control ingress and egress in a designated disaster or emergency area, the movement of persons within the area, and the occupancy of premises therein.

Suspend or limit the sale, dispensing, or transportation of explosives, and combustibles, not including ammunition.

Make provision for the availability and use of temporary emergency housing.

Make provisions for the control, allocation, and the use of quotas for critical shortages of fuel or other life and property sustaining commodities.

Designate members of the highway patrol, North Dakota national guard, or others trained in law enforcement, as peace officers.

Notwithstanding subsection 3, if a state of disaster or emergency relating to public health is declared and in effect, the governor may not issue an executive order under this section unless the executive order specifically addresses the mitigation of the declared state of disaster or emergency relating to public health.

Any person who willfully violates any provision of an executive order or proclamation issued by the governor pursuant to this chapter is guilty of an infraction.

The governor may authorize the adjutant general to recall to state active duty, on a volunteer basis, former members of the North Dakota national guard. Those recalled must possess the qualifications required by the disaster or emergency. Recall under this subsection is effective only for the duration of the disaster or emergency and recalled personnel will be released from state active duty upon competent authority that the requirement of their service under this subsection has passed. Compensation for personnel recalled under this subsection will be based upon section 37-07-05.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an order, proclamation, rule, or regulation issued pursuant to this section may not:

Substantially burden a person’s exercise of religion unless the order is in furtherance of a compelling governmental interest and is the least restrictive means of furthering that compelling governmental interest;

Treat religious conduct more restrictively than any secular conduct of reasonably comparable risk, unless the government demonstrates through clear and convincing evidence that a particular religious activity poses an extraordinary health risk; or

Treat religious conduct more restrictively than comparable secular conduct because of alleged economic need or benefit.

A person claiming to be aggrieved by a violation of subsection 10 may assert that violation as a claim or defense in a judicial proceeding and obtain appropriate relief, including costs and reasonable attorney’s fees.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 281, § 5; 1983, ch. 392, § 1; 1983, ch. 393, § 1; 1985, ch. 398, § 5; 2005, ch. 16, § 14; 2011, ch. 258, § 1; 2013, ch. 272, § 2; 2021, ch. 92, § 5, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 191, §§
2, 3, effective April 22, 2021; 2021, ch. 192, § 2, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 272, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 272, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

Law Reviews.

Emergency Powers of the Governor in North Dakota, 50 N.D. L. Rev. 45 (1973).

Note.

Section 37-17.1-05 was amended 5 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 5 of Chapter 92, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1410; Section 2 of Chapter 191, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1118; Section 3 of Chapter 191, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1118; Section 1 of Chapter 272, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1180; and Section 2 of Chapter 192, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2181.

37-17.1-06.
State division of homeland security.

The division of homeland security must have professional, technical, secretarial, and clerical employees as necessary for the performance of its functions. The director of the division shall fix the compensation of the staff in conformity with state merit system regulations and may make such expenditures within the appropriations therefor, or from other funds made available to the director for purposes of emergency management, as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

The division of homeland security shall prepare and maintain a state disaster plan and keep it current, which plan may include provisions for:

Averting or minimizing the injury and damage caused by disasters or emergencies.

Prompt and effective response to a disaster or emergency.

Emergency relief.

Identification of areas particularly vulnerable to a disaster or emergency.

Recommendations for zoning, building, and other land use controls, safety measures for securing mobile homes or other nonpermanent or semipermanent structures, and other mitigation and preparedness measures.

Assistance to local officials in developing and maintaining local and regional emergency management systems.

Authorization and procedures for the erection or other construction of temporary works designed to protect against or mitigate danger, damage, or loss from any disaster or emergency.

Preparation and distribution of emergency management assistance program guidance to the appropriate state and local officials.

Organization of manpower and chains of command.

Coordination of federal, state, regional, and local emergency management activities.

Coordination of state disaster or emergency operations plans with the disaster or emergency plans of the federal government.

Other necessary matters.

The division of homeland security shall provide technical assistance for the development and revision of local and regional disaster or emergency operations plans prepared under section 37-17.1-07.

In preparing and revising state disaster or emergency plans, the division of homeland security shall seek the advice and assistance of local government, business, labor, industry, agriculture, civic, and volunteer organizations and community leaders. In advising local and regional emergency management organizations, the division shall encourage them also to seek advice from these sources.

State disaster or emergency plans or any parts thereof have the force of law upon implementation by the governor.

The division of homeland security, in coordination with lead and support agencies, shall:

Coordinate the procurement of supplies, materials, and equipment during disaster or emergency operations.

Provide guidance and standards for local and regional disaster or emergency operational plans.

Periodically review local and regional disaster or emergency operational plans.

Coordinate state or state and federal assistance to local and regional emergency management organizations.

Establish and operate or assist local and regional emergency management organizations to establish and operate training programs and programs for emergency public information.

Make surveys of industries, resources, and facilities, within the state, both public and private, as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The use of sensitive and proprietary logistical data submitted to the state in confidence by individual industries and suppliers must be accorded full confidentiality and will be released only in aggregate form.

Plan and make arrangements for the availability and use of any private facilities, services, and property, and, if necessary and if in fact used, coordinate payment for that use under terms and conditions agreed upon.

Establish access to a register of persons with types of training and skills important in prevention, mitigation, preparedness, response, and recovery.

Establish access to a register of equipment and facilities available for use in a disaster or emergency.

Prepare, for issuance by the governor, executive orders, proclamations, and guidance as necessary or appropriate in managing a disaster or emergency.

Coordinate and may enter agreements with the federal government and any public or private agency or entity in achieving any purpose of this chapter and in implementing programs for disaster mitigation, preparation, response, and recovery.

Be the state search and rescue coordinating agency, establish access to a register of search and rescue equipment and personnel in the state, and plan for its effective utilization.

Do other things necessary, incidental, or appropriate for the implementation of this chapter.

The division of homeland security shall serve as a central information dissemination point and repository for initial notification information for spills and discharges in the state for hazardous chemicals as defined in section 37-17.1-07.1, oil, gas, and saltwater. The division shall develop processes to ensure proper state and federal agencies that have oversight responsibilities are promptly notified. The division shall also provide notice to local emergency management officials within a time that is consistent with the level of emergency.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 281, § 6; 1985, ch. 398, § 6; 2005, ch. 16, § 15; 2007, ch. 308, § 4; 2009, ch. 304, § 1; 2013, ch. 268, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 268, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

37-17.1-07.
Local or regional emergency management organizations.

All areas of the state are within the jurisdiction of and must be served by the division of homeland security and by a local or regional emergency management organization.

Each county shall maintain an emergency management organization that serves the entire county or must be a member of a regional emergency management organization that serves more than one county.

Each city shall provide an emergency management organization of its own, or it shall participate in the countywide emergency management organization. Each governing board of a city shall make its determination on the basis of the city’s emergency management requirements, hazards, capabilities, and resources. If a city provides an emergency management organization of its own, the city and county shall coordinate the city and county emergency plans.

The mayor of or the president of the board of city commissioners in a city with an emergency management organization and the chairman of the board of county commissioners shall notify the division of homeland security of the manner in which the city and the county are providing or securing emergency management activities, identify each individual who will coordinate the activities of the local emergency management organization, and furnish additional information relating thereto as the division requires.

Each local or regional emergency management organization shall prepare and keep current a local disaster or emergency operational plan for its area.

Each local or regional emergency management organization shall prepare and distribute to all appropriate officials in written form a clear and complete statement of the disaster or emergency responsibilities of their local agencies and officials.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 281, § 7; 1985, ch. 398, § 7; 2005, ch. 16, § 16; 2007, ch. 308, § 5; 2009, ch. 304, § 2.

37-17.1-07.1.
Hazardous chemicals preparedness and response program.

Program components.

The governor shall appoint members of the state emergency response commission to carry out the commission’s responsibilities as outlined in Public Law 99-499, 42 U.S.C. 11001, et seq., also referred to as SARA title III, and the responsibilities of the commission members as outlined in the North Dakota emergency operations plan.

In conjunction with the state emergency response commission, the local emergency planning committees, as appointed by the boards of county commissioners, and the local emergency management organizations shall coordinate the development and maintenance of a state hazardous chemicals preparedness and response program.

The director of the division of homeland security shall serve as the chairman of the state emergency response commission. In the absence of the chairman, the designated vice chairman shall serve as chairman. The state emergency response commission by vote will select the vice chairman to fulfill a two-year term. The chairman shall recognize the assignment of representatives to the commission who are designated through a delegation of authority by a member. The chairman shall designate a commission secretary, solely for the purpose of documenting and distributing clerical proceedings, from the staff of the division of homeland security.

For the purpose of complying with the reporting requirements set forth in sections 302, 304, 311, 312, and 313 of Public Law 99-499, 42 U.S.C. 11001, et seq., also referred to as SARA title III, the owner and operator of any facility, as defined in SARA title III, shall submit those reports to the North Dakota division of homeland security as required by SARA title III, which shall establish and maintain the state repository for these reports.

For purposes of monitoring, determining if emergency response may be required, and notifying local officials, owners and operators or responsible parties shall report all spills or discharges to the appropriate state agency as required by law. The report must include the name of the reporting party, including phone number and address; date; time of release; location of release; containment status; name of the chemical, if waterways are involved; and immediate potential threat. If the release occurs or travels offsite from a facility, the owner and operator or responsible party shall notify the surface owner within a reasonable time. State agencies that receive direct reports of spills or discharges shall provide the report information to the division within a time that is consistent with potential level of response needed.

Establishment of funds.

There is created in the state treasury a nonlapsing restricted account to be known as a state hazardous chemicals preparedness and response fund. The fund consists of revenue collected from the state hazardous chemical fee system and funds appropriated by the legislative assembly. Moneys in the fund shall be appropriated biennially to the division of homeland security for carrying out the purposes, goals, and objectives of SARA title III, and the state hazardous chemicals preparedness and response program.

The county treasurer of each county shall establish a nonlapsing restricted account, to be known as the county hazardous chemicals preparedness and response account. The county hazardous chemicals preparedness and response account consists of revenue from the state hazardous chemicals fee system, county, federal or state funds, grants, and any private donations provided to finance the county hazardous chemicals preparedness and response program.

Each owner and operator of a facility, as defined in SARA title III, shall pay an annual hazardous chemicals fee to the division of homeland security by March first of each year. The fee is twenty-five dollars for each chemical within the meaning of title 40, Code of Federal Regulations, part 355.20, or its successor which is required under section 312 of SARA title III, to be listed on the hazardous chemical inventory form (tier II) which the owner or operator must submit to the division. The federal requirements must be used for completing the tier II form, including the threshold amounts, as outlined in title 40, Code of Federal Regulations, part 20. The maximum fee for a facility under this section is four hundred seventy-five dollars. The director of the homeland security division may impose fees for both late filing of reports and late payment of fees. A late fee must equal the amount of the hazardous chemicals fee owed under this subdivision. After six months the director shall process further violations under willful violations in subsection 4. The division of homeland security shall transfer to the county hazardous chemicals preparedness and response account one-half of the regular fees collected from the state’s hazardous chemicals fee system.

The owners or operators of family farm enterprises that are not engaged in the retail or wholesale of hazardous chemicals and facilities owned by the state or local governments are exempt from the fee under subdivision c. For purposes of this section, the terms “family farm” and “farmer” have the same meaning as set forth in section 6-09.11-01.

The state and county governments are authorized to accept and may deposit grants, gifts, and federal funds into the hazardous chemicals preparedness and response fund and accounts for the purpose of carrying out the hazardous chemicals preparedness and response programs to include training, exercising, equipment, response, and salaries, and local emergency planning committee member stipends not to exceed thirty percent of state per diem per meeting attended. In lieu of stipends the committee chairman may provide a meal or refreshments other than alcoholic beverages.

“Hazardous chemical” means as defined in title 40, Code of Federal Regulations, part 355.20 and title 29, Code of Federal Regulations, part 1910.1200.

The state hazardous chemicals fee system does not supersede a city fee system for hazardous chemicals.

A person who causes a release, as defined in title 40, Code of Federal Regulations, part 355.20, of a hazardous chemical in excess of the reportable quantity of that chemical, as defined in title 40, Code of Federal Regulations, part 355.20, is liable for the response costs incurred by state or local hazardous chemical response personnel. The state agency, local agency, volunteer organization, or hazardous chemical response personnel, as identified in the state or local emergency operations plan, which undertakes a response action may recover those response costs in an action brought before a court of competent jurisdiction. If more than one jurisdiction, organization, or agency incurs response costs for the same hazardous chemical release or incident, those hazardous chemical response jurisdictions, agencies, organizations, or personnel may file a joint action and may designate one entity to represent the others in the action.

In the action to recover reasonable and necessary response costs, state agencies, local agencies, or volunteer organizations may include operational, administrative, personnel, and legal costs incurred from its initial response action up to the time that it recovers its cost. Reasonable and necessary costs are those additional costs incurred that are a result of the responsible party’s failure or inability to implement or initiate the necessary actions to protect life, property, and the environment.

A person who willfully violates any of the reporting, planning, or notification requirements outlined in the provisions of the Emergency Planning and Community Right-to-Know Act of 1986 [title III of Public Law 99-499, 42 U.S.C. 11001 et seq.], is subject to a civil fine of not more than fifteen thousand dollars for each separate offense. For purposes of this subdivision, each day of continued violation constitutes a separate offense. All civil fines collected under this subdivision must be deposited in the state general fund. The state and its political subdivisions and employees of the state or a political subdivision acting within the scope of their employment are not subject to the civil fines established in this subdivision.

Any person who knowingly falsifies information or who intentionally obstructs or impairs, by force, violence, physical interference, or obstacle, a representative of state or local government or state or local hazardous chemicals response personnel attempting to perform duties and functions in state or local emergency operations plans or complying with Public Law 99-499, SARA title III, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor. The state and its political subdivisions and employees of the state or a political subdivision acting within the scope of their employment are not subject to the penalty established in this subdivision.

If the director of the division of homeland security determines that a violation of this chapter has occurred, the director shall make all evidence available to the attorney general for use in any remedial action the attorney general’s office determines appropriate, including injunctive relief. Nothing in this section may be construed to deny use of the remedies authorized under chapter 32-40.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 382, § 1; 2001, ch. 16, § 3; 2005, ch. 16, § 17; 2007, ch. 308, § 6; 2009, ch. 305, § 1; 2013, ch. 268, § 2; 2017, ch. 244, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 268, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

Cross-References.

Classification of offenses, penalties, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

37-17.1-08.
Establishment of interjurisdictional disaster planning and service areas. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1985, ch. 398, § 22.

37-17.1-09.
Authority to utilize existing services and facilities.

In carrying out the provisions of this chapter, the governor and the executive officers or governing bodies of the counties and cities of the state are directed to utilize the services, equipment, supplies, and facilities of existing departments, offices, and agencies of the state and of the counties and cities thereof to the maximum extent practicable, and the officers and personnel of all such departments, offices, and agencies are required and directed to cooperate with and extend such reasonable services and facilities to the governor and to the emergency management organizations upon request.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 281, §§ 9, 19; 1985, ch. 398, § 8.

37-17.1-10.
Local disasters, mandatory evacuations, or emergencies.

Unless so declared in accordance with the provisions of subsection 4 of section 37-17.1-05, a local disaster, emergency, or mandatory evacuation order may be declared only by the principal executive officer of the county or city. It may not be continued or renewed for a period in excess of seven days except by or with the consent of the governing board of the county or city. Any order or proclamation declaring a local disaster, emergency, or mandatory evacuation must be given prompt and general publicity and must be filed promptly with the county or city auditor.

The effect of a declaration of a local disaster or emergency is to activate the response and recovery aspects of any and all applicable local disaster or emergency operational plans and to authorize the furnishing of aid and assistance thereunder.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 281, § 10; 1985, ch. 398, § 9; 2005, ch. 314, § 1; 2009, ch. 306, § 1; 2013, ch. 269, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 269, S.L. 2013 became effective March 18, 2013, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 2 of ch. 269, S.L. 2013.

37-17.1-10.1.
Burn ban — Penalty.

An order or proclamation under section 37-17.1-10 which includes a ban on open burning may provide for a penalty for a violation of the ban through a citation, a criminal complaint, or an information through the district court in the county in which the offense occurred. An individual who willfully violates a burning ban established by a local order or proclamation under this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 306, § 2.

Cross-References.

Classification of offenses, penalties, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.